Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2168.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 304(a)(4) of the act of December 19, 1990 (P.L.1372, No.212), known as the Early Intervention Services System Act, is amended to read:Section 304. Administration by Department of Education.(a) Overall responsibility.--* * *(4) The department shall provide for the programs of eligible young children who are not eligible for services provided in school district kindergarten programs and who are placed in approved [private] special education schools or 12345678910111213141516171819202122 chartered schools pursuant to the provisions of section 1376 or 1376.1 of the Public School Code of 1949 from the State funds appropriated to the department for special education in approved [private] special education schools. The department shall provide only for the excess costs for eligible young children who are eligible for services provided in school district kindergarten programs and who are placed in approved [private] special education schools or chartered schools pursuant to the provisions of section 1376 or 1376.1 of the Public School Code of 1949 from the State funds appropriated to the department for special education in approved [private] special education schools.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2168PN2810 - 2 - 1234567891011121314